Utah statutes.
53B-13-114.   Mandamus in Supreme Court -- Precedence.

(1)  If an official required by the proceeding authorizing bonds under this chapter to sign the bonds refuses to affix his signature to them, or if the attorney general refuses to certify the bonds as legal obligations, alleging illegality of the bonds, the board may bring an original action in mandamus in the Supreme Court of Utah.

(2)  The importance to the state and its inhabitants of the program of loans to eligible borrowers is such that this action brought in the Supreme Court should be given precedence over the other matters pending before the court, and the court is requested to give this action precedence and to render its decision concerning it at the earliest possible time.



Enacted by Chapter 167, 1987 General Session

